Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.725

Sanitary regulations.

It shall be the duty of every person engaged in the practice of dentistry or who shall own, operate, or manage any dental office to keep said office and dental equipment in a thoroughly clean and sanitary condition.

[ 1935 c 112 s 27; RRS s 10031-27. Prior: 1923 c 16 s 25. Formerly RCW 18.32.330.]